Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Standards and Schedules.

Administrative Code. —

For depressant, hallucinogenic, and stimulant drugs, see 7 AAC 32.

Sec. 11.71.100.
Controlled Substances Advisory Committee.

The Controlled Substances Advisory Committee is established in the Department of Law. The committee consists of

the attorney general or the attorney general’s designee;

the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner’s designee;

the president of the Board of Pharmacy or the designee of the president who shall also be a member of the Board of Pharmacy;

a peace officer appointed by the governor after consultation with the Alaska Association of Chiefs of Police;

a physician appointed by the governor;

a psychiatrist appointed by the governor; and

two individuals appointed by the governor.

Members of the committee appointed under (a)(5) — (a)(8) of this section serve terms of four years. A member of the committee receives no salary but is entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

The president of the Board of Pharmacy or the president’s designee is the chair of the committee.

The committee meets at the call of the chair of the committee.

The committee shall meet at least twice a year.

Five members of the committee constitute a quorum, except that a smaller number may adjourn a meeting in the absence of a quorum. A quorum being present, a majority vote of the total membership is required to take official action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 92 SLA 2014; am §§ 2, 3 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

Duties of committee — AS

11.71.110

Original Code Provision — None.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, rewrote (c), which read, “The attorney general is the chairman of the committee.”; in (d), substituted “chair of the committee” for “attorney general” at the end.

Sec. 11.71.110.
Duties of committee.

The committee shall

advise the governor of the need to add, delete, or reschedule substances in the schedules in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

;

recommend regulations for adoption by the Board of Pharmacy to prevent excessive prescription of controlled substances and the diversion of prescription drugs into illicit channels;

evaluate the effectiveness of programs in the state providing treatment and counseling for persons who abuse controlled substances;

recommend programs to the Alaska Court System to be instituted as alternatives to the prosecution or imprisonment of offenders who have no prior criminal record involving controlled substance offenses and who are charged with crimes involving controlled substances;

review and evaluate enforcement policies and practices of the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Law with regard to crimes involving controlled substances, and recommend modifications of those policies and practices consistent with the committee’s assessment of the probable danger of particular controlled substances;

review budget requests and recommend amounts for appropriations to the governor and the legislature for departments and agencies responsible for

enforcing criminal laws pertaining to controlled substances;

providing treatment and counseling of persons who abuse controlled substances; and

regulating the legitimate handling of controlled substances; and

advise the attorney general of the need to schedule substances by emergency regulation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

Controlled substances advisory committee —
AS

11.71.100

Original Code Provision — None.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, added (7), and made related changes.

Sec. 11.71.120.
Authority to schedule controlled substances.

If, after considering the factors set out in (c) of this section, the committee decides to recommend that a substance should be added to, deleted from, or rescheduled in a schedule of controlled substances under AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

, the governor shall introduce legislation in accordance with the recommendation of the committee.

If a substance is added as a controlled substance under federal law, the governor shall introduce legislation in accordance with the federal law.

In advising the governor of the need to add, delete, or reschedule a substance under AS

11.71.110

(1), the committee shall assess the danger or probable danger of the substance after considering the following:

the actual or probable abuse of the substance including

the history and current pattern of abuse both in this state and in other states;

the scope, duration, and significance of abuse;

the degree of actual or probable detriment which may result from abuse of the substance;

the probable physical and social impact of widespread abuse of the substance;

the biomedical hazard of the substance including

its pharmacology, in the effects and modifiers of the effects of the substance;

its toxicology, the acute and chronic toxicity, interaction with other substances, whether controlled or not, and the degree to which it may cause psychological or physiological dependence;

the risk to public health and the particular susceptibility of segments of the population;

whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a substance already controlled under this chapter;

the current state of scientific knowledge regarding the substance, including whether there is any acceptable means to safely use the substance under medical supervision;

the relationship between the use of the substance and other criminal activity, including

whether persons engaged in illicit trafficking of the substance are also engaged in other criminal activity;

whether the nature and relative profitability of manufacturing or delivering the substance encourages illicit trafficking in the substance;

whether the commission of other crimes is one of the effects of abuse of the substance;

whether addiction to the substance relates to the commission of crimes to support the continued use of the substance.

[Repealed, § 40 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

The committee has no authority over tobacco or alcoholic beverages as defined in AS

04.21.080

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 40 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

Definition of “immediate precursor” — AS

11.71.900

Controlled substances advisory committee —
AS

11.71.100

Duties of committee —
AS

11.71.110

Original Code Provision — None.

Legislative history reports. —

For statement of the purpose of the 1984 repeal of subsection (d) of this section, see the 1984 House Journal at p. 2287, in the paragraph captioned “Section 40.”

Sec. 11.71.125.
Emergency substance scheduling.

The attorney general may, by regulation, schedule a substance under this chapter regardless of whether the substance is substantially similar to a controlled substance listed in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.180

, if the attorney general finds that scheduling the substance on an emergency basis is necessary to avoid an immediate hazard to public safety.

In determining whether to schedule a substance on an emergency basis, or repeal an emergency regulation that scheduled a substance, the attorney general shall

assess the degree of danger or probable danger of the substance by considering the

actual or probable abuse of the substance including the

history and current pattern of abuse;

scope, duration, and significance of abuse of the substance; and

degree of actual or possible detriment that may result from abuse of the substance; and

risk to public health;

consider whether the substance has been scheduled on a temporary basis under federal law and may consider clandestine importation, manufacture, or distribution of the substance;

consult with the Controlled Substances Advisory Committee established under AS

11.71.100

; and

consult with the chief medical officer in the Department of Health and Social Services.

The attorney general may schedule a substance by emergency regulation under this section only if the substance is currently listed on a federal controlled substance schedule.

The attorney general shall clearly indicate in an emergency regulation that schedules a substance the appropriate schedule under this chapter that applies to the substance.

The attorney general shall post a notice on the Alaska Online Public Notice System (AS

44.62.175

) 60 days before the effective date of an emergency regulation that schedules a substance. The notice must include

a summary of the attorney general’s findings under (b) of this section; and

the finding required for an emergency regulation under AS

44.62.250(b)

.

The attorney general may not adopt an emergency regulation under this section that schedules an alcoholic beverage as defined in AS

04.21.080

, marijuana as defined in AS

17.38.900

, or tobacco.

An emergency regulation adopted under this section is subject to the requirements in AS

44.62.260(c)

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 5,
ch. 22, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 12, 2018.

Sec. 11.71.140.
Schedule IA.

A substance shall be placed in schedule IA if it is found under AS

11.71.120(c)

to have the highest degree of danger or probable danger to a person or the public.

Schedule IA includes, unless specifically excepted or listed in another schedule, any of the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, nalmefene, naloxone, and naltrexone, and their respective salts, but including the following:

raw opium;

opium extracts;

opium fluid extracts;

powdered opium;

granulated opium;

tincture of opium;

codeine;

ethylmorphine;

etorphine hydrochloride;

hydrocodone;

hydromorphone;

metopon;

morphine;

oxycodone;

oxymorphone;

thebaine;

any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of a substance included in (b)(1) of this section which is chemically equivalent or identical to any of the substances referred to in (b)(1) of this section; however, these substances do not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;

opium poppy and poppy straw;

concentrate of poppy straw which is the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the phennanthrine alkaloids of the opium poppy.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 57 SLA 2012.]

Schedule IA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan excepted:

acetylmethadol;

allylprodine;

alphacetylmethadol;

alphameprodine;

alphamethadol;

alphaprodine;

anileridine;

benzethidine;

betacetylmethadol;

betameprodine;

betamethadol;

betaprodine;

bezitramide;

clonitazene;

dextromoramide;

diampromide;

diethylthiambutene;

difenoxin;

dihydrocodeine;

dimenoxadol;

dimepheptanol;

dimethylthiambutene;

dioxaphetyl butyrate;

diphenoxylate;

dipipanone;

ethylmethythiamutene;

etonitazene;

etoxeridine;

fentanyl;

furethidine;

hydroxpethidine;

isomethadone;

ketobemidone;

levomethorphan;

levomoramide;

levorphanol;

levophenacylmorphan;

meperidine, also known as pethidine;

metazocine;

methadone;

methadone-intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane;

moramide-intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenyl-propane-carboxylic acid;

morpheridine;

noracymethadol;

norlevorphanol;

normethadone;

norpipanone;

pethidine, also known as merperidine;

pethidine-intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;

pethidine-intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carbox-ylate;

pethidine-intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;

phenadoxone;

phenampromide;

phenazocine;

phenomorphan;

phenoperidine;

piminodine;

piritramide;

propheptazine;

properidine;

propiram;

racemethorphan;

racemoramide;

racemorphan;

trimeperidine;

alfentanil;

alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)-ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4(N-propanilido) piperidine);

bulk dextropropoxyphene (non-dosage form);

carfentanil;

sufentanil;

tilidine;

para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);

3-methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenetnyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);

alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl) ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropan amide);

beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-l-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide);

MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);

PEPAP (1-(-2-pheynethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine) ;

3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide, also known as U-47700.

Schedule IA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

acetorphine;

acetyldihydrocodeine;

benzylmorphine;

codeine methylbromide;

codeine-n-oxide;

cyprenorphine;

desomorphine;

dihydromorphine;

drotebanol;

etorphine, except hydrochloride salt;

heroin;

hydromorphinol;

methyldesorphine;

methyldihydromorphine;

morphine methylbromide;

morphine methylsulfonate;

morphine-n-oxide;

myrophine;

nicocodeine;

nicomorphine;

normorphine;

pholcodine;

thebacon.

Schedule IA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, or which contains any of its salts, isomers, whether optical, position, or geometric, or salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, or salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB) (some other names include gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate);

when intended or used for human consumption:

gamma butyrolactone (GBL);

1,4 butanediol (BD);

gamma hydroxyvalerate (GHV);

gamma-valerolactone 4-pentanolide (GVL).

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 1, 2 ch 76 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 2011; am § 4 ch 57 SLA 2012; am § 24 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

Definition of “opiate,” “opium poppy,” “peyote,” “poppy straw” — AS

11.71.900

Misconduct involving controlled substances in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

For the applicability provision relating to the 2011 change to subparagraph (b)(1)(O) of this section, see § 3, ch. 4, SLA 2011.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (c)(82).

Sec. 11.71.150.
Schedule IIA.

A substance shall be placed in schedule IIA if it is found under AS

11.71.120(c)

to have a degree of danger or probable danger to a person or the public which is less than substances listed in schedule IA, but higher than substances listed in schedule IIIA.

Schedule IIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, or which contains any of its salts, isomers, whether optical, position, or geometric, or salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, or salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, also known as 4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine and 4-bromo-2, DMA;

2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine, also known as 2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine and 2,5-DMA;

4-methoxyamphetamine, also known as 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine and paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;

5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;

4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, also known as 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine;

3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;

3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;

bufotenine, also known as 3-(B-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole, 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol, N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine, and mappine;

diethyltryptamine, also known as N, N-diethyltryptamine and DET;

dimethyltryptamine, also known as DMT;

ibogaine, also known as 7-ethyl-6, 6B, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5H-pyrido [1´,2´: 1, 2] azepino [5, 4-b] indole and tabernanthe iboga;

lysergic acid diethylamide, also known as LSD;

mescaline;

n-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

n-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

peyote;

analogs of phencyclidine (PCP), including:

ethylamine analog, also known by some trade or other names as follows: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine (1-phenylcyclohexyl)-ethylamine, N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;

pyrrolidine analog, also known by some trade or other names as follows: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine, PCPY, PHP;

thiophene analog, also known as 1-[1-(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl]piperidine and 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine, TPCP, and TCP;

1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-pyrrolidine, also known as TCPy;

psilocybin;

psilocyn;

3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA).

Schedule IIA includes cocaine or coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, mixture, isomer, ester, ether, or preparation of cocaine or coca leaves produced directly or indirectly by extraction from coca leaves, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, including the isomers, salts, and salts of isomers of cocaine and other derivatives of coca leaves whenever the existence of these esters, ethers, isomers or salts is possible, but does not include decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine.

Schedule IIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

amobarbital;

mandrix or mandrax;

mecloqualone;

methaqualone;

pentobarbital;

phencyclidine, also known as PCP;

secobarbital.

Schedule IIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the nervous system:

amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers;

methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;

methylphenidate;

phenmetrazine and its salts;

fenethylline;

N-ethylamphetamine;

3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, and MDEA;

N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4-(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, and N-hydroxy MDA;

4-methylaminorex, also known as 2-amino-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline;

N,N-dimethylamphetamine, also known as N,N,alpha-trimethylybenzencethaneamine or N,N,alpha-trimethylphenethyline, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;

cathinone;

2-methylamino-1-phenylpropan-1-one, also known as methcathinone and cat, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of isomers;

4-methylmethcathinone, also known as mephedrone, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;

3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone, also known as MDPV, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;

substituted cathinones, including any compound, except bupropion or a compound listed in another schedule, structurally derived from 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone by modification in any of the following ways:

by substitution in the phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, alkylenedioxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the phenyl ring by one or more other univalent substituents;

by substitution at the 3-position with an alkyl substituent;

by substitution at the nitrogen atom with alkyl or dialkyl groups or by inclusion of the nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure.

Schedule IIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances:

immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine: phenylacetone also known as phenyl-2-propanone; P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; methyl benzyl ketone;

immediate precursors to phencyclidine, also known as PCP:

1-phencylclohexylamine;

1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile, also known as PCC.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 76 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 11.71.160.
Schedule IIIA.

A substance shall be placed in schedule IIIA if it is found under AS

11.71.120(c)

to have a degree of danger or probable danger to a person or the public less than the substances listed in schedule IIA but higher than substances listed in schedule IVA.

Schedule IIIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric, and salts of these isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

benzphetamine;

chlorphentermine;

clortermine;

[Repealed, § 12 ch 76 SLA 1990.]

phendimetrazine;

any compound, mixture, or preparation in dosage unit form containing any stimulant substance listed in schedule IIA, which compound, mixture, or preparation was listed on August 25, 1971, as an excepted compound under 21 C.F.R. § 1308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative composition shown in that list for those substances, or which is the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of any controlled substance.

Schedule IIIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system:

amobarbital, secobarbital, or pentobarbital or any salt of these substances, combined with one or more other active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any other schedule;

amobarbital, secobarbital, or pentobarbital or any salt of these substances, approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;

any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid or any salt of barbituric acid;

chlorhexadol;

glutethimide;

lysergic acid;

lysergic acid amide;

methyprylon;

sulfondiethylmethane;

sulfonethylmethane;

sulfonmethane;

tiletamine and zolazepam, or any of their salts.

Schedule IIIA includes nalorphine.

Schedule IIIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in the following quantities:

not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;

not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

not more than 300 milligrams of dihydrocodeinone per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;

not more than 300 milligrams of dihydrocodeinone per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

Schedule IIIA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances or that contains any of its salts, isomers, whether optical, position, or geometric, or salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, or salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

hashish;

hash oil or hashish oil;

tetrahydrocannabinols;

parahexyl;

dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved drug product;

nabilone;

(6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10, 10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol, also known as HU-210;

(6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10, 10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol, also known as Dexanabinol or HU-211;

1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, also known as JWH-018;

1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, also known as JWH-073;

(2-methyl-1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-naphthalenyl-methanone, also known as JWH-015;

1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole, also known as JWH-398;

1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole, also known as JWH-250;

1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, also known as JWH-019;

1-(2-(4-(morpholinyl)ethyl))-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, also known as JWH-200;

2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol, also known as CP 47, 497, and its dimethyloctyl (C8) homologue; in this paragraph, “homologue” means a chemical compound in a series in which each compound differs by one or more alkyl functional groups on an alkyl side chain.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 6, 7, 12 ch 76 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 2011)

Cross references. —

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 11.71.170.
Schedule IVA.

A substance shall be placed in schedule IVA if it is found under AS

11.71.120(c)

to have a degree of danger or probable danger to a person or the public which is less than the substances listed in schedule IIIA, but higher than the substances listed in schedule VA.

Schedule IVA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including their salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

barbital;

chloral betaine;

chloral hydrate;

chlordiazepoxide;

clonazepam;

clorazepate;

diazepam;

ethclorvynol;

ethinamate;

flurazepam;

lorazepam;

mebutamate;

meprobamate;

methohexital;

methylphenobarbital, also known as mephobarbital;

oxazepam;

paraldehyde;

petrichloral;

phenobarbital;

prazepam;

alprazolam;

halazepam;

temazepam;

triazolam;

midazolam;

quazepam;

flunitrazepam;

ketamine hydrochloride.

Schedule IVA includes any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substance, including its salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric, and salts of these isomers, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible: fenfluramine.

Schedule IVA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric, and salts of these isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

diethylpropion;

phentermine;

pemoline, including organometallic complexes and chelates of this substance;

mazindol;

pipradol;

SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane);

cathine;

fencamfamin;

fenproporex;

mefenorex.

Schedule IVA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing not more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid.

Schedule IVA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including their salts:

dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1,2-dephenyl-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane);

pentazocine;

propoxyphene.

Schedule IVA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substance or its salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid: 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of these isomers, including tramadol.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 8, 9 ch 76 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 73 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 4 SLA 2011; am § 25 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Original Code Provision — None.

For the applicability provision relating to the 2011 change to subparagraph (b)(11) of this section, see § 3, ch. 4, SLA 2011.

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (b)(28) was enacted as (b)(27). Renumbered in 1997.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (g).

Sec. 11.71.180.
Schedule VA.

A substance shall be placed in schedule VA if it is found under AS

11.71.120(c)

to have a degree of danger or probable danger to a person or the public which is less than substances listed in schedule IVA, but higher than substances listed in schedule VIA.

Schedule VA includes any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following limited quantities of narcotic drugs or their salts, calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as specified in (1) — (6) of this subsection, which includes one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture, or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by schedule IA substances alone:

not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;

not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

not more than 0.5 milligrams of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 66 SLA 1987.]

Schedule VA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation that contains any quantity of the narcotic drug buprenorphine and its salts.

Schedule VA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

propylhexedrine, except when contained in a Benzedrex inhaler;

pyrovalerone.

Schedule VA includes, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances, including their salts, esters, isomers, and salts of esters and isomers if those salts, esters, or isomers promote muscle growth, whenever the existence of these salts, esters, and isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: anabolic steroids. In this subsection, “anabolic steroids” means any drug or hormonal substance that is chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, and corticosteroids) and that promotes muscle growth; “anabolic steroids” does not include an anabolic steroid that is expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and that has been approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services for that administration, unless a person prescribes, dispenses, or distributes that type of anabolic steroid for human use; “anabolic steroids” includes the following:

boldenone;

chlorotestosterone (4-chlorotestosterone);

clostebol;

dehydrochlormethyltestosterone;

dihydrotestosterone (4-dihydrotestosterone);

drostanolone;

ethylestrenol;

fluoxymesterone;

formebulone (formebolone);

mesterolone;

methandienone;

methandranone;

methandriol;

methandrostenolone;

methenolone;

methyltestosterone;

mibolerone;

nandrolone;

norethandrolone;

oxandrolone;

oxymesterone;

oxymetholone;

stanolone;

stanozolol;

testolactone;

testosterone;

trenbolone.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1987; am § 10 ch 76 SLA 1990; am § 11 ch 53 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Original Code Provision — None.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that subsection (f) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Sec. 11.71.190.
Schedule VIA.

A substance shall be placed in schedule VIA if it is found under AS

11.71.120(c)

to have the lowest degree of danger or probable danger to a person or the public.

Marijuana is a schedule VIA controlled substance.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 2 1998 Ballot Measure No. 8; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

Definition of marijuana — AS

11.71.900

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Original Code Provision — None.

For provisions relating to the medical use of marijuana, see AS 17.37.

For regulation of marijuana, see AS 17.38.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (b), “ AS 17.37” was substituted for “ AS 17.35” to reflect the 1999 renumbering of section 1 of 1998 Ballot Measure No. 8 as
AS 17.37. The language was subsequently deleted in the 1999 amendment.

Sec. 11.71.195.
Exempted drugs.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a substance the manufacture, distribution, dispensing, or possession of which is explicitly exempt from criminal penalty under federal law is exempt from the application of this chapter and AS 17.30. This exemption includes any substances that may, under 21 U.S.C. 301-392 (Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act), be lawfully sold over the counter without a prescription. This exemption also includes those substances listed in 21 C.F.R. Sec. 1308.22 on April 1, 1980.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 73 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — AS 17.12.090.

Sec. 11.71.200.
Listed chemicals.

Listed chemicals are chemicals that are used in manufacturing a controlled substance in violation of this chapter. Listed chemicals include

anthranilic acid, its esters, and its salts;

benzaldehyde;

benzyl cyanide;

ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;

ergonovine and its salts;

ergotamine and its salts;

N-acetylanthranilic acid, its esters, and its salts;

nitroethane;

norpseudoephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;

phenylacetic acid, its esters, and its salts;

phenylpropanolamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;

piperidine and its salts;

pseudoephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;

3,4-methylenedioxyphenyl-2-propanone;

any salt, optical isomer, or salt of an optical isomer of the following chemicals:

ethylamine;

hydriodic acid;

isosafrole;

methylamine;

N-methylephedrine;

N-methylpseudoephedrine;

piperonal;

propionic anhydride;

safrole;

acetic anhydride;

acetone;

anhydrous ammonia;

benzyl chloride;

ethyl ether;

hydriotic acid;

hydrochloric gas;

hydrophosphoric acid;

iodine and crystal iodine;

lithium metal;

potassium permanganate;

red phosphorous;

toluene;

2-butanone (or methyl ethyl ketone).

History.

(§ 6 ch 73 SLA 2000)